The Crane:

Now then, back up to the throne room and through the gate.  Head to Mellow
Hills.  Summon some minions and it's time to go sheep killin once again!
Get that lifeforce!  Lifeforce = minions.  Those jars over by the sheep are
also back, so go ahead and break em.

It's up to you whether you wanna walk back around the farm or take the
shortcut from last time.  I chose to go back through the farm because the
stuffies to break had respawned.  Follow the path until you get to the
fallen pillar that requires 10 minions to push.  Now that you have them,
have them move it!  Watch another scene. Now we gotta prove we ain't
harflins.

Ok well, walk up to the wheat field and set it aflame!  Send in your minions
once the fire is out to grab what's left.  Follow the path around to another
wheat field.  Before setting it on fire, turn right for a little alcove of
jars.  Break em and then cross the bridge.  Burn them little halfling
buggers.  Run up and grab the treasure.  Have your minions kill the loose
halflings that didn't die in the fire.

Gnarl will now start talk about killing innocents.  For this walkthrough,
DON'T KILL ANYONE INNOCENT!!!  Walk a little past the people there and on
the right, break the jars, and on the left, the barrels.  Further down,
you'll find a Blood Pit.  Sacrifice the minions if you need life.  I didn't
at this point, but you might need some.

Carefully head around the corner, summoning more minions if you need to.
Kill the halflings that come at you.  On the left are some more halflings
that'll throw stones at you, bust em up.  Kill the ones also that are in
front of the gate.  Don't turn the wheel there yet.  Instead, head to the
right.  Loot the barrels and chests, then kill the sheepies to harvest more
lifeforce.  Now head back to the wheel and have your minions turn it.  Go on
through the gate.

Slave Camp:

A new waypoint and a new spawn point, how nice!  Take advantage if you need.
Break the mushrooms.  Head up a bit and around the large log on the right
side to break some barrels.  Don't hurt the people here.  Up a little bit
in the top right corner are a few more barrels to break.  Then turn the
corner and up a little for some more barrels on your right.  Kill the
halflings here.

In this next area are a ton of halflings.  Head to the left side first to
take care of some annoying stone throwing guys.  There's a few crates toward
the back also.  Then go back to where you came in and to the other side of
the area.  More halflings to kill!  Once they're dead, let the prisoners out
of the cage in the center of the area.  (Turn the wheel)

Heading up, you will find more halflings.  To the left is a blood pit and a
spawn point.  To the right are more halflings to kill!  And... a nasty troll.
Sic your minions on it and support them to lessen the chance some will die
during the fight.  If they do, just spawn some more.  Afterwards, go right
and up the stairs for a chest and some barrels.  Go to the gate and turn
the wheel.  Yay!  We found our crane!  Break the boxes and then use your
minions to bring the crane to the waypoint.  Before heading back to your
tower, head up the stairs there and turn the wheel to free the slaves.

Go ahead through the Tower Gate to see the reconstruction effort.  Now we
need to get ourselves a mistress.  You can head down to the dungeon to
fight some stuff if you want to, but I chose not to until I get a more...
respectable horde.  Other than that, nothing new yet.

Head through the gate back to Meadow Hills again.  Make your way down and
around the path again to the gates of the city of Spree.  By the way, the
sheep and jars are back if you wanna partake.

Retrieve the Food:

Return to Spree and break the barrier blocking the town.  You'll be given a
new quest by Archie.  Your destination is the Halfling Homes.  So head to
the right and have your minions turn the wheel to open the gate to the next
area.  Break the barrels and kill the halflings.  Turn left for a chest and
right for some barrels.  Before moving on, from the broken wall there, head
right and you'll find a domination spell on the right.  Grab it, turn the
wheel to open the bridge, and let your minions bring it back to the
waypoint.  Head back to the path that leads to the halflings, then proceed
down the path.  Kill the halflings, there's ground troops and the ones that
throw rocks at ya.  Pillage the barrels and jars and continue along the
path.  Then you'll see a halfling house.  Lord of the Rings anyone?  Now go
ahead and send your minions into these houses to loot and kill the halflings
you see running around.  Now head down the stairs.

Crash the Halflings' party:

Continue down the stairs and you'll see a bunch of halflings to kill and
another troll.  I don't know about you, but I lost a bunch of minions here
><, well the spawning pit isn't too far away at least, so if you need, run
back and grab some more before killing the rest of the halflings.

[A troll strategy emailed to me by DalamarNL:
He has a nasty belly jump attack which kills at least 4 or 5 minions instantly.
If you see him about to perfom this attack, quickly recall your minions. This
way I was able to clear that area losing just 1 minion.]

Now that they're dead, it's time to gather... provisions!  So, go ahead and
break all of the jars and barrels, and loot the houses as well.  We can't go
through that gate just yet, so head between the houses to the big ol' halfling
house. Get the treasure outside then turn the wheel.  Head on inside.

Halfling Homes:

Once you get in here, pretty much everything is breakable, so break the door
down, kill the halflings, and break anything you find. :D  Go through the
stairs on the left side of the room.  Kill the sleeping halflings at the
bottom of the room and break all of the jars and anything else you find to
break.  That's all you can do in this room, so head back to the previous
room, down the stairs and break down the door in the center.

Go ahead and kill the halflings behind the door.  You'll need to go right
because the gate ahead is closed and the wheel is upstairs.  So then, head
right through the opening.  Breaking the bouncing pots will yield some rats
that will go ahead and attack the halflings, so kill both!  Now, sweep your
minions though the center and have them break the stuff up the ramp.  Now
then, keep heading right and around the corner.

You'll see a halfling come out of the small opening, whenever you see those,
have your minions destroy them or else more will come out.  Go ahead and turn
the wheel on the left side of the room, but before going through the gate it
opened, head to the right side of the room, sweep your minions down the ramp
there, and continue on down the hall.  Follow the pretty linear path, killing
the few stray halflings until you get to the other side of the entrance room
that you couldn't get to when you first walked in.

Pillage the room, then have your minions grab the giant sack o' cash!  They
will bring it back to the entrance to the waypoint and then we'll be richer!
Now then, once they're done, we can finally head to the gate we opened.  So
head there now, it's just up from the entrance area.  Immediately head left
into the dungeon room where some poor peasants have been put in a cage.  They
don't wanna be lunchies, so let's save em.  First go around and kill the
sleeping halflings guarding them.  Go ahead and sweep your minions through
the small opening by the entrance toward the halfling hole to close it up
before finally turning the wheel.  Once free, the peasants will mention the
food.  Go ahead and pillage the rest of the room before proceeding.

Once you're done, go back out and continue down the hall.  Break the door
down, then go though and head to the left side of the room.  Before smashing
the pumpkins, plug up those halfling holes and break the stuff.  Smashing the
pumpkin will reveal another tower object!  Have your minions take it to the
waypoint.  Now you can summon 15 minions!  I like the sound of that!

Return to the room you found the tower object (if you followed your minions)
and examine that red wheel.  Two spokes are missing and we gotta go find them
to be able to turn it.  So, let's get started.

Go smash the door on the right and kill the halflings behind it.  Head up
the stairs on the left side, (ignore the path forward for now) to see a room
full of sleeping halflings.  Kill them, loot the area, then break down the
door here.  Head through, kill more halflings, and you'll find the first
spoke very easily noticeable in the middle of the halflings and stuff to
break.  Now send a minion to carry it back and let's proceed.

Continue down the hall, breaking stuff as you go until you come to a wheel.
Turn it and let's go back to the path we skipped before.  Take this path now
and head through the gate you just opened up.  You'll see the spoke in plain
view, but to get it you'll need to sweep your minions around the room.
Don't forget to plug up the halfling holes as well.  Once you're finished
sweeping around, it's time to head back to the red wheel and turn it.  Head
on through the door.

Halfling Homes (2):

Break the jars and stuff.  Head down the path and break the things on the
sides of the door before moving on.  When you go through the door...omg...
the whole room is full of halflings!  Well, slowly progress through the
room, killing halflings little by little and plugging up their holes.
There's a lot of loot here too, and a wheel to turn.  Take your time to make
sure you get everything you can.  It's beneficial to start out on the left
side first and work your way right, but that's just me.

Anyway, once you're ready to move on, turn the wheel and head through the
door.  Head around the path and you'll see a fat, tubby halfling chef coming
out from down the hall.  Kill him and head down the path he came from.
You'll see a bunch of chefs in the kitchen area, but before taking them out,
you can break the baskets to let the rats out to weaken them before we take
them on.

Keep heading down the hall, breaking more jars and barrels.  There's a mana
pit if you need it and go ahead and kill the halfling chefs.  Proceed through
the kitchen and you'll see the food!  Before grabbing it, turn the wheel and
pillage the rest of the room.  Now send your minions to pick up the food and
follow while they carry it.  You'll see the people of Spree thankful to you
for getting their food back.  So just walk over to the platform and recall
your minions.  The people will take the food back.

Now then, since that is settled, let's get out of here.  Head back to Spree.
(I returned to the tower, then warped back to Mellow Hills so I could gather
more lifeforce from sheepies.)

Remember Crashing the Halfling Party?:

Time to head back to the Halfling Village and to the gate we couldn't go
though before.  Go ahead and loot the halfling house and turn the wheel.
When you head into the party area, you'll see the... lovely Melvin.  Eww...
><  Your minions will be bewitched.  Go ahead and kill the fiddler so that
your minions will stop dancing around, you won't get any corruption points
for this (this tip emailed to me by Sonik Team, thanks!).

Kill Melvin Underbelly:

We need to kill tons of halflings in this area and it's a pain I think.
We also need to find two red spokes to turn the red wheel so we can follow
Melvin.  One of them is on the right side around the bend near some halfling
houses.  Kill, pillage, and grab it!  Near here is a spawning pit and a
blood pit, so use them if you need.  Head on up past the pits and you'll
find an area with a giant barrier of fire around some object that you can't
get until we find the red minions.  So, don't send the ones you have into it.
However, up on a platform here is the next red spoke.  Grab it and let's
turn the wheel.  Some halflings will pop out, so get rid of them and head
into the house.

Melvin's Kitchen:

Once inside, go left and kill the sheep.  Break stuff!  Head through the
opening and Gnarl will tell you that the red minions are here!  Yay!  So,
let's turn the wheel for now.  Sweep your minions around to it and turn it
to fry the chefs.  So now go around the room breaking stuff until you get to
another wheel.  Turn it and go through the gate.  Break the many barrels and
food and stuff.  Go around the bend and you'll see Melvin... Grossness...

To kill Melvin, send your minions to attack, supporting with your axe or
your fire until he starts to roll around the room.  At that point, recall
your minions quickly and move away from him so they don't get squished.
Once his hp is low, smack his butt.  Eww... Now that that's over with, head
through the door and on the right side you can replenish your minions.  Now
head up through the next door and discover the red minions home!

Retrieve the Red Minions Hive:

Head to the left side of the room and turn the wheel.  Now you can summon
red minions!  So put some browns away and grab some reds.  Sweep the reds
into the fire barrier next to the spawning pit.  So now we can walk through.
Let's collect some red lifeforce.  Have your reds attack some buggies and
grab the red lifeforce.  When you walk into the next area, you'll see the
Red Minion Hive.  You need 10 red minions to move it.  So we need to kill
some more bugs in the lava with the red minions.

Once you have 10 reds, use them to carry the hive.  Follow along on the path
until you get to some halflings.  Use your reds to burn em up.  More
halflings will appear, so use all your minions on them.  Now let's carry
the hive a little farther.  Continue to follow them until you get to a room
with chefs.  Position your reds on the left side and have them hold to shoot
the chefs.  Now select the browns and sweep them to the wheel on the right
side of the room.  Once they're dead, carry the hive the rest of the way.
Now we need to head back out so we can use the reds on that burning barrier
near the halfling party.  So head through the waypoint to the tower.

Use this waypoint inside the tower to go to Mellow Hills and you'll see a
girl that tells you the sheepies are breeding faster now that Melvin is dead.
So, go ahead and go sheep hunting!  Once your done though, head back to the
halfling party area through Spree again.  Use the red minions on the fire
barrier that we left alone earlier to get... a lot of money!  Now then...

(My game messed up here at this point and even though I killed Melvin, it
showed the same scene where you first see him again ^^;  But when I went
back in, Melvin was still dead, but I was able to get more red lifeforce!)

Finding a Mistress:

Return to Spree.  Head to another of the gates at the back of the town and
a man will tell you about a mysterious lady and Castle Spree being under
attack.  Well, open the gate and let's check it out.  Head down the path
and you'll see the castle on fire.  Go up and kill the buggies for some more
red lifeforce.  Use your reds on the next fire barrier.  Keep heading up the
path and kill the bugs and the raider.  Keep heading up, the castle
drawbridge is closed at the moment.  Make a right and kill more raiders.
Use the reds on this next fire barrier.  Sweep your minions in but be careful
because another raider will pop out, so kill him before turning the wheel.

Now then, turn the wheel and head into the castle via the drawbridge.
Be careful, a few raiders will pop out, and when I say a few, I mean at least
7 of them.. ^^;.  Now then, which way first?  If you head up the stairs on
either side, you'll find some jars to break.  Heading back down the stairs,
the fire barrier that you see is closing off the dungeon entrance, but before
heading down there, head to the right to an opening, killing the raiders
along the way.  Over here is a waypoint, a brown spawn pit, a mana shrine and
around the corner is a tower object that your minions can bring back to the
waypoint.  So do that to recover and it will increase your hp!  Nice!  So now
we can head into the dungeon area.  Use the reds to get rid of that fire
barrier.

The dungeons of Spree:

First thing, remove the fire wall with your reds.  You'll get your first
glimpse of your mistress.  Now then, down the stairs and kill the horrible
raiders that forced the people to lock themselves in that cell.  Now we gotta
get luggage... what are we, bell boys?  Oh well... Ok then let's loot the
room before moving on.  Head to the left side to an opening where there's
some buggies and lots of stuffies to break and pillage.  Don't forget to
break the fire barrier to free the people.  Then head back and we'll go
right from the entrance now.  Break the fire wall with the reds, kill the
stuffies, and head up the stairs for another fire barrier.  Break this one
and head around to the campfire.  Shoot through it to kill the guys easily
with your reds then break it!  Have the red break the next campfire too and
kill the guys there.  Keep heading around the path for some treasure!

Now head down the stairs by breaking more fire barriers.  Go around breaking
the rest of the barriers in your way and killing the raiders until you get
to the wheel.  This will open the gate below.  Have your reds fling some
fire down to kill the raiders that pop out and head all the way back around
to the entrance area, killing stuffies along the way.

Head through the gate you just opened when you turned the wheel, up from
the entrance.  Make sure you have reds with you and head down the stairs.
This ugly evil eye is what's spawning the raiders.  So you need to position
some of your reds on the far stairs so they can attack the eye from a
distance.  Go around to the other side and position more reds on the other
side of the eye.  Then attack the other stuff with your browns until the eye
is dead.

Bring the luggage back to your sweetheart!  Now then, she'll be sprucing up
your Tower of Evil while you're doing your dirty work.  So, go up the stairs
next to your throne and check it out.  You can customize your tower if you
like.  Now then, once you're finished, your next objective seems to be
Heaven's Peak.  BUT FIRST....

Retrieve the First Tower Smelter:

Now that we have reds at our disposal, we can retrieve the steel smelter!
Head back to Spree and take the gate that we haven't opened yet and you'll
get a quest!  Head to the right around the bend and you'll see a ruined sort
of building.  In here is the smelter!  Use the reds to break the barrier
around the smelter and bring it out.  While walking it out and around, those
darn peasants will close the gate on you.  Ahh well, kill the halflings here
and then run around to the left side of the area where the sheep are, killing
the knee-biters as you go.  Turn the wheel here and bring the smelter to the
waypoint, stopping now and then to kill the halflings.  So now, go ahead and
forge some stuffies if you'd like and let's be on our way.  Not to Heaven's
Peak yet though...

Evernight:

Head back to the place where you found the steel smelter behind Spree.
Head up to the middle of the area this time and you'll see a scene with
some peasants complaining about roots.  Keep heading down the road and use
some reds to break through the barrier.  Keep going to a new area.

So let's explore shall we?  Head to the right to two... dead telepathic
elves?  O.o  Okies, now we gotta kill us some rabid unicorns... So head
to the left of the elves to the first one and kill it.  Keep heading along
until you find a stream.  DO NOT SEND YOUR MINIONS INTO THE WATER, THEY WILL
DROWN!!!!  Now then, sweep your minions across the small plant bridge there
on the left side and hold them there while you walk across the water. (or you
can just walk across the water and they will find the path themselves, as
emailed to me by Xvg)  Recall them and kill the second unicorn there.  Grab
the jars then break the barrier here for a new minion spell.  Turn the wheel
here to make a bridge.  Have your minions bring the spell across the bridge
and to the waypoint.

Head back to the elf ghosties.  Break the barrier here, head up the path
killing the nasty little forest creatures along the way.  You'll see a scene
as to what's going on here.

Kill Oberon:

So now we gotta kill this guy.  We can't go left because of the poison
plants, so let's head right and bread the barrier.  You'll see a health pit
here, but more importantly, you'll see a root with a pulsating white ball of
light at the end.  Target it and have your minions destroy it.  A new quest
will pop up and we'll need to destroy five more of the root nodes.  Now then,
head back around the next bend that was previously blocked by the root.
There are some poison plants here, but as you approach a little, you'll see
a green minion and some more demonic forest creatures.  Kill the creatures
and head around the path until you see a few magical creatures and Gnarl
will point out a poison pod.  Use a minion to bring it over and blow them up.

Now sweep your minions across both of the bridges there and tell them to
hold position up there.  Walk across the water to the other side and recall
them.  Walk up and kill the next magical creature with another pod.  Break
down the barrier here and head on in.  Sweep your minions over the plant
bridge here and to the left telling them to hold across the water from you.
Head across the water and loot the area.

Follow the path around, sweeping your minions across yet another bridge to
kill the forest creatures there.  Bring them back and you'll see another
poison pod and some more magical creatures.  Use the poison pod again to kill
the dancing creatures.  Now break down the barrier here.  Use yet another
poison plant to kill even more magical creatures.  Break another barrier
here.

Before following the green minions into the cave, grab the tower object
there.  Make the minions turn the wheel and carry it back to the waypoint to
get an increased mana bar!  Yay!  Now head back to the cave via the newly
found shortcut.

Viridian Caverns:

So head on in and follow the greens around.  You'll get some green lifeforce
from the monsters in this cave, so stock up!  Just keep following the greens
and don't walk into the poisonous plants, take the paths around them.  Once
you get to the room with the giant block in the middle, head to the right
and carefully sweep your minions down the vine and have them move the block
to make a bridge.  Now go back around to where the completed bridge is and
cross it.

Follow the greens some more until they walk into a branch on the right with
poison gas.  Wait until the gas recedes then follow through killing the
buggies.  Keep following, dodging the gas until you come to a barrier.
Break it and you'll find a blood pit if needed, some spawning pits, and if
you walk around the bend you can have your minions push the block you saw on
your way in.  It'll bridge the gap on the far end of the room.  Now head to
the path next to the archway there and follow it around, dodging more gas
sprays.  Break the barrier here.

Head up and over the path we made and...Finally!  We can summon greens! :D
So summon some greens up (at least 7) and let's start moving that green hive.

[There is a glitch that happens to some people, emailed to me by Geezus 1337:
Once the greens are carrying their hive, makesure they don't drop it while on
a slope (it only occurred to me onthe slope before the area where the troll
is, a bug killed one of theguys). Even if you clear the whole way, they'll
pick it up, but theywon't move and the only way to fix that is to exit the
area andre-enter. The poisonous plants will be back and at least one bug
(at glitch point), but the troll and most other bugs are gone. Obviously
leaving the area with greens makes them vanish.]

Get the greens to clear the poison plants from around the hive, then have
them carry it.  Follow them around until they get to more poison gas.  Have
them clear it out and continue along.  Kill the bugs as they appear and clear
the gasses.  As you are going along, you'll see a troll.  You'll need to
sweep some green minions down to where it is and around it's back to kill
it.  Once it's dead, use them to turn the wheel and bridge the gap.  Have
the greens continue to bring the hive to the waypoint!

More Oberon nodes:

Now that we have greens, there's so much we can do!  But for now, you might
wanna gather some more lifeforce, forge, and whatever.  Once you're ready
to move on, go ahead back to Evernight, to the entrance of Viridian Caverns.
Don't go in however, we're going to sweep our greens over to the poison field
surrounding another root node.  Attack the node, kill the bugs that come out
and go ahead and break the rest of the poison barriers blocking your way.
Keep heading up the path until you get back to the area with the weird tree.
Turn immediately right for a shield spell.  Carry it back to the waypoint.
Now you can cast a shield upon yourself to protect against oncoming enemies.

Now head back to Oberon's tree again and under the root with the poison
barrier.  Break this down and head around the building and down the stairs.
If you head up the stairs on the other side, it looks like there is a dead
end here, and yes it is, however, position some reds and greens here with a
guard marker because there is a monster that they can kill coming up and it's
easier to have them attack from up here so they don't die.

Head right and around the path breaking the things there until you come to a
barrier and a large monster carrying a rather large mace.  He'll break the
barrier down himself, so let him come to you so your greens and reds you
positioned up top can kill him easily.  Continue along.  Head up the stairs to
the right to the semi-broken door.  Break it down the rest of the way to find
a treasure trove!  Get all of the loot and lifeforce, then head back out and
continue along the path.

You'll see here a large courtyard and in the back is another root node.
Let's carefully kill all of the enemies here that are guarding it.  Make sure
to kill the priesties before they resurrect the other monsters.  Before
breaking the node, make use of the mana/blood pits, as well as replenishing
your minions.  Once you break it, the other side of the courtyard is
crawling with enemies again!  Carefully kill all of these guys, taking out
the priests ASAP.

The way I did this was to draw the little archer creatures to you, kill them,
and when the priests come to resurrect, kill them quickly.  Just try not to
alert the minotaur looking things until most of the other stuff is dead.

Once that's done, you'll see a red wheel next to the platform where the
spawning pits are located.  The missing spoke is on the ground right down
the stairs next to it.  So pick it up, put it back on, and let's turn that
wheel!  It will open the door down the stairs.  Go on through and break the
jars on the other side.  Head around the path until you find another tower
object!  This one will allow you to command 20 minions!  Finally! :D

Now we can't go any farther without the blues, unfortunately.  So let's head
now to Heaven's Peak.  You can get there by warping from your tower.

Heaven's Peak:

Head up a little and the guys there will talk about how the city is closed
off and they'll mention a Sir William.  Head on into the camp.  You'll witness
one of the refugees turn into a zombie if you walk up a little.  Head
toward the back of the camp and one of the guys will call you over.  He'll
show you a way into the city, but now you really need those blues!  Head back
out the way you came in and to the left is a little road leading to a LOT
of sheep!  Since we're being good, don't go killing any or the farmer will
attack you, you'll kill him, and you'll get evilness points!! ><  [But if you
feel like you just can't resist, here's something emailed to me by Coolguy:
But no!!! I pushed all my minions back to the tower. I walked to the farmer on
my own, and he started to attack me, well I lured him all the way into the
zombies, and the zombies killed him for me!!! I didn't get any corruption
points at all! And look, free sheepies!!!]

Keep heading along until you reach a rusted looking gate.  Head through and
you'll be in a cemetery.  Kill the zombies that appear (break the doors to
the mausoleums if you wish for extra lootage) then keep heading along the
path.  Head past the other mausoleums to where more zombies will come out of
the ground.  Dispose of them and on the right side is a poison barrier.  Break
this down and kill the zombies.

Head around to the left side of the platform where more zombies are located.
Run up the stairs, taking out the zombie priests and grab the tower object.
Follow your minions around, turning the wheel when you come to it.  You'll
receive a larger health bar!  Now that's more respectable!

Now let's head back to where we found this tower object with at least 10 red
minions.  Go to the fallen pillar on the side where there are a ton of fire
barriers.  Use 10 reds to move it aside and then have them dissipate the
barriers.  Go around the area breaking barriers, killing bugs, and gathering
some much needed red lifeforce.  There's a red minion pit to the left in the
back of the area.

Now that that's over with, let's head to get some blues!  Head back to the
Refugee camp.  Go to the back and break down the barrier there.  Kill the
MANY zombies that greet you there.  Head up to the left a little to find a
succubus.  Kill her with your minions and support as needed.  A little past
her is another group of spawning pits and a waypoint.

Now, go back to where you killed the succubus and follow the path around to
get another tower object!  Bring it back to the waypoint and now your mana
is increased!  Now go back to where we found this mana object.  Send some
greens over the fallen log to dissipate the poison.  Send all your guys to
the other side now and hold them there.  Take the path through the water to
join up with them.  Before heading into the cave there, you might wanna turn
around and knock the wall behind you to form a bridge for easier access.

The Moist Hollows:

So walk into the cave, follow the blues around, and see a scene showing their
special ability.  That could come in handy!  Head around the path, killing
some birdies as you go.  Collect 10 blue lifeforce.  Then you might wanna put
your other guys away (outside) so they don't drown.  At the end of the path
you'll find the blue minion hive next to a blue spawn pit.  Summon at least
10 blues and have them grab the hive.

The blues have stopped and can't go any farther yet.  So head down the other
available path to see some more blues in danger! :O  So let's save em!
Recall your blues carrying the hive, spawn more minions from the spawning pits
here and put them to work.  First have your minions hold position down the
ramp, but back a little away from the water.  Select a blue minion, target
one of the eggs you see in the middle of the water, and have him grab it.  Use
it to lure the birds to your other minions so they can kill them.  This will
be a strategy used in many places, you'll find.  Now the blues are safe!

Now return to the blue hive and put your other minions back.  Have them pick
the hive back up and break the mushrooms and stuff blocking their path.  Now
you'll find out that the blues are magic resistant and only they can kill
wisps.  So kill some and keep going, clearing more mushrooms.  Before
going too far, you'll come across a path leading left to a bunch of wisps.
Yay!  Blue lifeforce!  Loot the room before heading up the path in the back
of the room.  Kill the birds and have your minions pull the block here.

Return now to the hive.  Have the minions pull this block out at the bottom
here and continue along the path with the hive, clearing out more mushrooms.
There's a blue spawn pit here.  Up here you will find a giant water serpent.
Time to kill it.

What I did here was, go to the right where the brown pit is, summon some
browns while still having some blues to resurrect.  Send your blues down the
minion path, but not too close to the serpent.  Now, take your browns and
move up to the serpent until he attacks, then move back quickly, sending
your browns to attack its head and supporting with your weapon.  Have your
blues resurrect the ones that die if they can.  Just keep this strategy up
until it dies.  If you have a better way, go ahead :D.

[Another strategy was emailed to me by Lincoln:
Place a guard marker next to the blue spawn point that's out of the creature's
reach. Then, call a single minion to you. Sweep him quickly across and through
the serpent's attack radius. The serpent should strike and miss the moving
minion. Quickly place another guard marker for the one minion to keep him from
following you, and then run up to the serpent while he is still stuck.
Repeatedly attack him with your Overlord until he moves away again.  Repeat as
necessary to defeat the creature.]

[Here's another variation emailed to me by N:
Send your browns to tease the serpent so it strikes, then send them to jump on
its head. After no more than 1-2 seconds (before it has a chance to throw them
off!), quickly recall them. Repeat until dead.You shouldn't suffer a single
casualty, so the blues can just stayback.]

[Another method emailed to me by swordsman5:
Leaving the Hive where it is, take 4/5 blues further down the path past the
serpent, send them across the river to operate the windlass that rebuilds the
bridge. Once the bridge is up, recall the blues and send them back to their
spawn pit near the stationary hive. Just before the bridge is a Brown spawn
pit, take a few of these and clear the path ahead, a short way up there you
will find a Blood fountain, pin the browns there. Head down the path and enter
the water and take on the serpent alone, if you are in the water it will
attack you, beat it up until your health is down to 1/4 then head back out to
the blood fountain, sling in a couple of browns to replenish your health, then
go back and finish the serpent off. I found this method far quicker and less
minion consuming than some of the other methods listed.]

Now then, carry the hive farther and break more mushrooms. Kill the bugs and
kill the froggies up the path.  Continue along until you get to some
geysers.  Guide your minions through to the wheel to form a bridge for the
hive to cross.  Using the guard marker here is very useful.  Break any
mushrooms along the way that hinders your blues carrying the hive.  You'll
see a brown spawning pit here and another geyser blocking your path.

So take the path right with some browns and blues.  Kill the wisps and frogs
and have your blues pull the block down in the water at the end of the road.
Head back to the brown spawn pit and take the path that is across from it,
it's kinda hidden, for some blue bugs, barrels and a giant pile of money!
You can't bring it back yet, but your can come back for it.  Now take the
path to the left of the waterfall-geyser and you'll come to a broken bridge.
The only 2 ways I can think of doing this here is to either have 1 blue take
the egg away from the wheel so the others can turn it, or just kill the
birds with your fireballs so they can turn it.  Once the bridge is completed,
head across and move the rock.

Return to the hive.  Move it along the road, clearing more mushrooms out
of the way.  Finally they'll find a waypoint to put it in.  Yay!  Now go back
and grab that giant sack of cash.

Outside the cave:

Now you can head outside through the water.  There is so much we can do now.
But first we need to take care of all the birds out in the water there.
If you head to the left around the path, you'll find the waypoint in the
swamp where you can summon more minions.  Head to where the birds are and
position your minions on land while you draw birds to them to kill.

Once that's done, you can grab that giant bag of treasure.  If you head into
the water with your blues, and follow it under the castle bridge, there's
a bunch of stuff to loot.  Keep going and there's a blue spawn pit.  Head up
the path on land and you'll be back in the cemetery.  So let's grab 10 blues
and head over to the sewer gate.  Before moving the downed pillar, you might
want to grab some more minions and set up a guard marker on land. (You'll
see why!)

Move the pillar that's blocking the sewer gate and O.O a LOT of zombies
will appear!  Lure them to your guys on shore and get rid of them.  [Or you can
do what was emailed to me by Bryan: Make the zombies appear and when they do
run back to the tower gate and go to your tower.go back to heavens peak and
when you go down to the spot the zombies will be gone!]

Before heading in there, let's return to Mellow Hills for a minute.  (I
know...that came out of no where...)  If you follow the path around past the
entrance to Spree and keep going toward the slave camps to the brown minion
spawn pit next to the blood pit, there will be a path that's kinda hidden
behind the brown spawn pit.  Head around that path and to the shore. Send
some blues over to grab the tower object.  Bring it back, making the bridge to
the waypoint for more minion control!  Now head back to Heaven's Peak to the
sewer entrance.

The Understreets:

Head up the path until you see two stairways, one leading left and one right.
Up on the right and around the path is a bunch of loot and a brown spawning
pit.  The one on the left however, leads to a whole bunch of zombies. O.o  I
just went up and slowly killed them with my overlord (health regeneration
armor really helps).

[A better strategy was emailed to me by Anthony:  Take the right path to the
looting area where both a Blue and Brown spawn pit are.  Presently, you only
have blues, and they're not fighters at all.  Simple.  Command one brown to
come out of its hole, unfortunately, it will drown.  If you're quick, or if
you have a blue already standing by in the water, you can command the blues
to grab the drowned brown and carry it back to land to revive it.  You can
continue this method until you get quite the army.  There is a pipe between
the two staircases in the main watery area for your new-found army to march
across and take care of the zombies.]

[I got another email from Maxurion.  Before you summon browns you can:
What you do is send some blue minions down the pipe onto the little patch of
land and set a guard point there. then you summon the browns slowly and the
blues save them when they drown.]

Once they're dead, head around the path and you'll find barrels and chests to
pillage.  Keep heading around until you see the brown and blue spawning
pits.  Now you'll see some boombo birds and eggs guarding a red spoke, but
leave it for now.

First grab some browns and blues and turn around heading through the door
blocked by mushrooms and barrels.  Go through there, around the path and kill
the zombies.  It's so much easier with help... Here's the red wheel and we
need 3 spokes.  Loot the platform that you're on then head back to the
previous room with the birds.

So, set up your guard markers, send a blue to get an egg, bring it back and
let your browns kill the birds while the rest of the blues res.  Or you could
always, as Akira emailed me, "Get as close to the birds, and give em a fiery
demise!!! (use fire spell on em) so you dont have to waste time getting the
eggs and losing your minions."  Retrieve the red spoke.  Two more to go.

From the red wheel, head down the stairs and head left.  Set up a guard marker
here and break down the barrier in the water.  Lure the zombies over to your
minions and then head up the next set of stairs once they're dead.  Kill the
bugs, loot, and break down the door.

Kill the zombie priests then break the barrier to the right.  Grab the 2nd
red spoke then return here.  Send your minions over to turn the wheel in this
room.  Head through the door you opened there and to the right killing the
bugs.  Leave your guys here and head in the water.  You'll find a bunch of
zombies to lure them to your minions and head back in.  To the right is an
area to loot.  Head back down the water path and around to a bunch of bugs
and lootage.  If you head up the stairs you'll see a red spawning pit there.

Grab a red guy and break the fire barrier there to the rest of your horde.
Head back to the red wheel with a few reds and to the right of the wheel is
a pipe that you can sweep some minions across.  Set up a guard marker of a few
reds and blues to resurrect just in case.  Sweep them across the pipe and have
them shoot at the zombie priests across the water and the zombies that are on
the floor level.

Go to the spot where you break the barrier leading to the zombies.  If you take
that path over and around, killing the zombies, you'll get to that same
platform where the final spoke is.  Have a blue grab it and return it to the
red wheel.  Now we can turn it and move on.

Go through the gate and you'll see a member of the Silent Order, so loot and
then head left.  The people will be happy that you cleared the path behind
you and return to town.  There are some spawning pits and a waypoint here.
So loot the area and put away all but the blues.  Head to the back of the
and down some stairs.  Kill the bugs for blue lifeforce if you wish then
follow the path up some more stairs and a blue spawn pit.  If you try to
sweep your minions to turn the wheel, another water serpent will appear. ^^;

The best solution I have here is to take a full battalion of blues over and
try to turn the wheel before the serpent eats them all.  Walk through the
gate you opened.  There will be a brown spawn pit down the way a little.
Now if you want to take out the hydra, do it from this direction.  Either
walk over and take it out yourself, which takes a long time but you won't
lose minions, or position your blues near the water to resurrect while you
and your browns attack from the higher platform when it attacks.  Or there is
a green spawning pit in the zombie room if you'd rather take greens.  Either
way kill it.  Leave the 3 giant sacks of cash for now. (We're coming right
back)

[Another solution was emailed to me by Wil.  What he did was:
Just before you get to the waypoint, there's a platform overlooking the Boomba
birds in this room. Boomba birds repeatedly spawn here and head for the nest.
I set a small battalion of six reds on the edge of this platform, where they
could bombard the boombas with fireballs. Then, with the remainder of my horde
as blues, I went around the corner to the other platform. I then sweeped down
into the room with the blues with a feint-and-retreat strategy to urge the
serpent to strike, then sweep the blues -- all of them -- onto its head. I
summon them back (with B -- not by sweeping, because most will continue trying
to fight) just as the naga retreats. About ten strikes with my complement of
14 blues is enough to kill it.

If you lose blues in the fight, the reds are leaving a lot of Boomba lifeforce
on the other side of the room. Also, there are a few respawning blue bugs down
the stairs behind you. Between these two sources, you should actually come out
of the battle with *more* blues than you went into it with.]

[This was emailed to me by D:
What I did and it sort of worked was send one blue to get an egg. then lure
the boombas to the serpent. I think the serpent went after the boombas. I sent
the rest of my blues to the wheel. I lost about four which isn't bad
considering i started out with 19.]

[This is another way emailed to me by Jeff:
Now when I did this I only had 20 blues in reserve....unfortunately many of
them had died during my dungeon expedition. However, I noticed that the Boomba
birds are the best solution when low as I was. I took a group of 5 Blues and
placed a marker next to the furthest location near the boombas that I could
reach on the right side. I then pressed the B button one time to bring one
back under my power, and aimed him at the boomba birds eggs. If you use the
right trigger and send him on a mad dash towards the eggs, he (at least in my
experience with it) will always have just enough time to grab an egg before he
gets attacked. If you use your sweep ability as he carries the egg he won't be
harmed at all by the birds. Now guide him towards the Serpent and when you get
just close enough for him to try to attack you, quickly sweep your blue in a
circle. This causes the Serpent to miss on his attack, and prevents any
boombas from getting a cheap shot on your blue. Then quickly run the blue
behind the serpent and press the B button again to call him back to you,
unharmed. However, you now have as many as four angry boombas swarming the egg
your blue dropped, and a giant angry serpent blocking them from your goal. The
boombas begin attacking the Serpent! The egg is usually destroyed shortly
thereafter, but the damage is done and the creatures keep attacking one
another. The Serpent will generally dominate the birds, but they do pretty
substantial damage when all together. Simply rinse and repeat this process and
you won't lose a single Blue, nor will you have to fight at all. It might take
a little more time if you can't get all four boombas to follow your blue every
time (it is sometimes necessary to sweep him straight through the lot of them
to get their attention) but you will find it much more minion friendly,
especially if, like me, you're running a bit short on the ones you need.
Especially when you need 15 to get the large money sacks in one go. Of course,
you can still attack some of the birds with reds afterwards as well and then
send blues to get the lifeforce they drop.]

[Here is another strategy emailed to me by Krispy Critters:
When you have access to the serpents area go close to the spot where the
serpent likes to strike and position a guard marker for all your minions just
out of reach. Then walk up to the edge and summon one minion from the group to
attract the serpent to strike. As the minion walks up take a couple of steps
back and hit your action button before the serpent strikes to kick the minion
down. Once the minion is on the ground the serpent strikes but cant grab ahold
of the minion which enables you to hack away at its head. The minion gets back
up after a couple of seconds where you repeat the kick to knock them down and
yada yada .. within no time the serpent is dead and you have wasted no minions.
If the serpent manages to get one minion simply call over another and repeat.]

[One more strategy emailed to me by brian:
Found this strategy a really easy / cool way to take down the serpent in the
UnderCity

2 browns
rest greens (I happened to have 20)

Guardmarker the greens, and walk them up the platform until they're just out
of reach of the serpent.  When they become invisible, sweep your browns in and
bring them back. when the Serpent tries to eat them, the Greens LAUNCH into
him, killing him if not the first blow, then the second.  HAIL GREENS!!]

Turn back around and head around the path on land until you reach a room full
of more zombies.  There are some spawning pits around to help you out.  Also
in the middle of this room is another spell so take it to the waypoint for
the Confusion spell!  Loot the room and then head back to the 3 giant sacks
o' cash.  Bring them back and head outside to Heaven's Peak town.

Heaven's Peak:

When you head into this area, you'll get the quest for the new smelter.  If
you turn the wheel here, you'll get another quest to kill Sir William.  Ok
then, when you turned the wheel, you opened the drawbridge.  So head out of
the city and grab some minions, making sure to have at least 1 red.

Go back into the city and into the Understreets again.  Kill the stuff in
the room, pillage, and then head down the stairs to the left from the
entrance.  Break the fire barrier here and head down into the 2nd level.

Understreets (2):

Once you enter, loot the room.  Kill some bugs and zombies. Head along the
path, killing more zombies as you go.  Head around killing stuff and
looting.  Once you get to the room with the wheel, turn it and head to the
gate it opened.  Kill more stuffies and grab more lootage.  Follow the path
further around for a mana pit if you need it, and keep heading down.  More
spawning pits are around here.  Keep heading until you see a scene with the
military zombie controlling the others.  Head in and smash them, killing the
Zombie Lord first.  Pillage the room then turn the wheel up on the platform.

Head through the door it opened, looting as you go.  Head around the path
where you'll find more spawn pits, kill the zombies and turn this wheel.
Follow the path around more and from the gate you opened, head left to
the durium smelter!  Head through the waypoint and forge!

Heaven's Peak City:

From the drawbridge where you enter the city, head left following the road.
On the left side is another tower object.  Now you have the flamethrower
spell!  So head back into the city once you're done putting it into the
waypoint.  On the left side of town up some stairs is some barrels and a fire
barrier.  You'll see a scene of some starving people and we have to help.

Break the barrels and the fire barrier and you'll see some dark knights.
If you try to kill these knights, they will keep being resurrected by the
priests in the back.  So what I did was place a guard marker there and let
my minions distract the knights while I ran up the stairs behind them.  Kill
a few of the priests around there and you'll see a scene.  Now you're their
"god".  And the fighting will cease.

Head back down the stairs and follow the path next to you around until you
find a large sack o' cash!  Carry it to the waypoint.  Now if you turn the
wheel that was right next to the cash, it will just lead to another
drawbridge that'll loop around back to the original waypoint of this area.

Head back to the main part of town and down the stairs.  Head around to the
left and to the path between the 2 stairways.  Make a left up here and go
around the building there.  Head left through the hole in the wall.  Turn
right and walk down toward a bunch of zombies and a wheel.  Sweep your
minions over to turn the wheel.  This will make a bridge to where the zombies
are.  Head across and kill them, then down the path to fight boombo birds
and more zombies.  You'll notice another tower object there.  Sweep your blues
to grab it and bring it back for more mana!

Now it's time to head back to the city entrance to the right side of town.
Break the fire barrier and kill the zombies.  Head down the path, turning left
and up the stairs, killing more zombies.  Break the fire barrier here and
you'll see some people.  They will turn into zombies and attack you.  Kill
them and break the fire barriers around.  On the path, to the right are
some spawning pits if you need them.  Go up the stairs until you find the
Halfway to Heaven Inn.

Halfway to Heaven Inn:

Head inside and you'll see a scene if you walk over to the barrels to the
left.  Break those barrels to be able to follow the mysterious figure in the
red cloak.  Head through the door there and around the path.  Break the
barrels in your way and kill the rats.  Send your minions through the minion-
sized hole there more lootage.  Break the door on the left for a blood
pit.  The other door is the way on.  Loot around before continuing.

Break the door down here to see the red cloaked guy head through a gate.
Unfortunately it'll close by the time we can move again.  There's a lot of
red-cloaked people in here, and they call themselvese the Order of the Red
Dawn.  Breaking the door on the left side will yield you another tower
object.  This time it's more minion control!  So bring it back.

The door on the right of the room leads to some more loot, but more
importantly, it leads to the wheel we need to turn to open that gate.  Head
to the back of the room and sweep your minions through the small opening
towards the right to the wheel.  Once the door is open, the Red Dawn people
will start to attack you, so take them out.  Head through the gate there and
up the stairs to the left.

Kill the Succubus Queen:

Now you'll be in a large room with a large wheel.  The wheel opens the door
across from where you enter.  Before opening it though, let's head through
opening on the right.  Break the door at the end of the hall for rats,
some loot, and a red spawning pit.  Continue up the stairs to a small wheel.
This gate leads back to the bar.  So return to the room with the big wheel
and turn it.  When you do, the Red Dawn people will attack you again.  Kill
them then head through the gate and kill the succubus.

Find Velvet:

Well, now we need to find Velvet, but before we do, let's grab the statue
and take it back with us.  The statue will be displayed in the spawning pit
room in your tower, according to an email I got from Jonathan. [Emailed to me
by dude_da_man: it will also "remove" the three succubae guarding Angelis Keep]

Leave the bar
for now.  Once outside, head down the stairs to the right down the path.  There
is a wall here that we can break down to form a bridge.  Heading down this
path, you will come across many zombies, so kill them.  It leads right around
to the castle, and our next destination.  Head on in and follow the linear
path up the stairs and you'll see spawning pits.  Head inside.

Angelis Keep:

Head in and you'll be yelled at by a smug, arrogant man.  This is Sir
William and he's the one we've been chasing in the red cloak.  He'll run away
again, so kill the Red Dawn guys.  Loot the area, then go through the door
Sir William escaped through.  Kill a ton of Red Dawn guys until you see a
scene with Sir William.  He'll challenge you, so let's kick some butt!
Attack him until he leaves.  Kill the Red Dawn people that come out, then
follow where Sir William went.

You'll come across a room with 2 succubae. ><  Kill them with your minions,
your fire, your weapon, just kill them!  Continue along the path until you
see a red wheel missing a spoke.  The room beyond the door here contains
Velvet, who you can hear if you walk up to it.  We can't go in yet, so head
around the path still and FINALLY we get to kill this jerk.

Sir William is very easy, just hack 'n slash him with your weapon while your
minions go to town on him.  Just dodge his attacks as best you can, and he'll
drop.  Break the statues if you wish, some contain money.  Grab the red
spoke so we can turn the wheel.  Go back and turn it and you'll see a
scene.  Now you have a choice.  Do you keep Rose, or dump her for Velvet?

Since we're good this time, you must choose Rose.  Just turn the wheel and
ignore the bed.  Go ahead and upgrade your tower more and you'll get some...
appreciation from your mistress!

Rose has different upgrades than Velvet.  The list for the upgrades was
emailed to me by Dan:
the Dark Castle upgrades for choosing Rose are;
Botanical Garden (where that empty room is)-3000 gold
Girl Statues (like the ones you see in heavens peak)-750 gold
Rose Vases (also like the ones in heavens peak)-750 gold
Blue minion equip-5000 gold
Greater Crown Top (bigger spikes)-1500 gold
Grand Fire Bowl (bigger bowls)-1500 gold
White Marble Walkway (instead of red carpet)-1500 gold
Greater Imperial Throne (bigger spikes with a touch of dark blue)-2000 gold
Golden Guardian Statues-1500 gold
Golden Chimera Statues (well the claws, bangles, head-dress, collar and wing
edges)-2000 gold

Also, Rose will upgrade your brown and blue minions.  She will go ahead and
upgrade the browns automatically, but you'll need to buy the blue upgrade for
5000 gold.

Kill Oberon Part 2:

Now we can get back to the Oberon business.  Head back to Evernight and over
to Oberon's tree.  Head down the path on the right side until you get to
some water.  Bring some blues to pull that block you see in the water there.
Head through the water, following the path to another root node.  Break it.

Keep going along the path until you get to the Elves' Sacred Grove.  This is
important!!  Don't use fire here (or red minions) or you WILL burn the
tree and get corruption points.  Kill the bloody unicorns (either with your
Overlord or head back a little and grab some minions out of the spawning pits
near the grove) and get the tower object for more life!  When you follow your
minions back, you'll find a new waypoint gate for Evernight Swamp that was
previously blocked off by the root.

If you head to Viridian Caverns, to the left of the entrance, across some
water is another of the sacks o' cash, bring it on back to your waypoint!

Return to Oberon's tree.  While facing the front of the tree, take the left
path under the root.  Head up the path and down the stairs.  Keep going down
around the path.  You'll get to a root that is a minion bridge down into the
water.  Sweep a few blues down over to the other side to turn the wheel there.
It will form a bridge over to our next dungeon.  So head across and break the
barrier.  Head on in.

Skull Den:

So head in and follow the path around, killing some creatures that pop out
of the ground.  Keep following the path and there are some priest creatures
there.  When you head over, some other archer creatures will pop out of the
ground.  Take out the priests first so they can't resurrect.  Now continue
down the path.  You'll come across more monsters, this time a few priests and
a minotaur looking guy.  Just take out the priests first, like last time.

We can't go through the path straight ahead because it's blocked by a root,
so head right.  While heading down the path, if you turn right to a small
alcove, there's some stuff to break and a brown spawning pit.  Head back out
of the alcove and to the path directly across where you'll find more priests.
After killing them, head around to the back of the room for another tower
object!  This time it's a mana increase.  When you're minions go to grab it,
however, a bunch of priests will appear.  Go ahead and kill them, then they
can take it safely back to the waypoint.

Head back around the path and continue on until you get to a dead end.  Head
to the right and break the barrier down, killing the minotaur-like creature.
There's some water behind him, so only take blues with you.  This little
alcove is a treasure trove, so go ahead and pillage.  Afterwards, grab your
guys again and head out, taking the path straight across.  Keep going until
you get to another root node.  Break it, then kill the enemies that pop out.

Now that this root is gone, we can go in the opening that was previously
blocked.  Head back down the path, turning right, then continue down to the
end.  Turn right and head through the door.  It leads back to Evernight.

Turn the wheel here and you'll form a bridge over the chasm.  This bridge will
lead right back to the waypoint gate in Evernight, so if you need to grab more
minions, go ahead.  Once you're ready, face the cave entrance that you just
came out of and head to the right, up and around to find lots of trolls.
Kill them and continue up the path to find the entrance to the Mother Goddess
Temple.

Mother Goddess Temple:

Ok, you'll see a scene with a woman and her band of men looting the temple
and you'll also get a new quest to find the four keys that will lead to the
Inner Sanctum.  Head up into the next room and kill the troll.  There are
three paths out of this room (four if you count the one behind you :P).  The
one forward we can't go through yet because the door is not open at the
moment.  We need the four keys to open it.  So let's get started.

Start by heading right.  You'll see a scene with elves that will attack
whatever they see.  So, don't let them see you.  This room is a puzzle.  If
you would like to solve the puzzle, follow the directions in the next
paragraph.  If you say, "Oh forget it!  I'm sick of this **** puzzle!", then
just take a battalion of blues and kill the spectral elves, as these are the
only ones that can kill them.

Wait until the two sets of elves go into the rooms on the side, then quickly
have three minions turn the wheel on the right, then three more on the left.
Both rooms have to be filled with elves, because if some come out, you'll
hafta start all over again.  Both sets of elves will just go from one side to
the other.  This might take some time and patience, but once the elves are all
shut up, have three more minions open the stone coffin in the middle of the
room for the first key.

Leave the minions that are holding the doors closed there and head into the
next room with at least 9 more.  In this room are more elves, with more doors
on the side, and more wheels on the sides.  There are more coffins to open
as well, though, unfortunately one of them contains a key.  So, the puzzle
is pretty much the same here, though the wheels are harder to get to, since
they are farther away and around the corners.

This room takes more patience than the previous one (at least if you're bad at
it like I was XD).  So once you have the elves trapped up, you can use three
more minions to go ahead and open the stone coffins in the middle of the
room.  The one on the top right contains the key.  Carefully bring all of
your minions back to the main entrance room.

This time, head down the left path.  More watchful elves will greet you,
hooray... ><  This time there are no wheels though.  The elves will just
kinda float around the giant pillar in the middle.  There are two stone
coffins here, as well as two more around the other side.  When the elves
aren't on your side of the pillar, send some minions to open the stone
coffins.  Run around to the other side and open the ones over here,
making sure the elves don't see you.  The one with the key is on the other
side of the room from the entrance, the one on the left when facing them.

Continue into the next room.  On either side of the entrance are more stone
coffins, though neither side has the key.  Actually if you try to open them
up, a guy in black drops down for you to attack.  In the back of the room is
two alcoves with more chests.  Watchful elves guard the on the right, and
that is where the key is.  Guide them away from there with your Overlord, then
have your minions open the stone coffins there.  You'll get the last key and
the Inner Sanctum will open.  Now head back to the main room and we can now
go through the door that was previously blocked.

When you head in, you'll see a scene and you'll find that the statue is gone.
We'll find it later, but for now, head up the stairs and grab the minion
spell.  Next to it, you'll find the last root node finally.  Now we can kill
Oberon once it's broken!  When you try to break the node, however, a few
trolls will appear, so kill them.  Then break the last of the root nodes.

Kill Oberon... finally:

Head through the opening that the root was blocking there (to the right of
where the root node was) and you'll be back at the bridge we made earlier.
Follow the path around to Oberon and let's kill him.  Send your minions in
to attack him.  A scene will ensue and some enemies will come, so kill them
before continuing your assault on Oberon.  Dodge the roots as they come up.

After each wave of enemies, send your minions up to damage Oberon further.
Once he says, "Finish this," run up with your Overlord and smack him.  Now
he's dead.  Go ahead and grab the shield spell you see there and replenish
your minions.  Behind where Oberon was, is the path on, so let's head through
now to the Dwarven Lands!

Golden Hills:

There's a lot of gold to be had here, as well as some awesome new armor/
weapons for your minions!  Head up the path and you'll find a new waypoint
gate.  To the left, you'll find some sheep to kill.  Head up the path now
toward the little dwarven village.  Kill the dwarves and pillage the place.
Just like the halfling holes from before, sweep your minions into the dwarf
houses to plug them up, or else they will keep coming.

At the back of the village, behind some barrels, you'll find another tower
object!  Bring it back for more mana!  Head through the village until you
reach an area with slugs.  Push the cart over the hole to plug it up so more
slugs can't come out.  If you head to the right from here, you'll see some
trapped elves, so free them.  Kill the dwarves here and plug up their houses.

Back at the cart you pushed over the slug hole, head up the hill and around
the path to find a dwarf party area.  Let's crash it!

[A good strategy was emailed to me by wadka13@gmail.com:
The BEST way to beat this section is to leave the barricades intact and guide
FIVE of your minions down a path that will move the ore cart and reveal some
slugs, then station your reds in a position that overlooks the slug pit.  If
you have 5 or more, then you will eventually eliminate more dwarves than
slugs.  Once you work down most of the drunk dwarves, you can  send your
minions to pull the ore cart back over the slug hole, and overwhelm the
remaining dwarves.]

Go ahead in and kill all of the dwarves here, loot the place, and get the
minion spell up the stairs.  Now head back down the path to the cart that you
placed over the slug hole again, this time breaking the barrier next to it.
Kill the slugs and dwarves and continue down to another barrier.

Break this barrier and kill the dwarves around here.  When you get to the
end, you'll see a scene and find out that the elves are trapped by slugs in
the mine.  You also need to fight the rock giant here.  First turn the wheel
to bridge the gap.  This path leads back to the waypoint gate.  When you're
ready to fight the rock giant, break the barrier.

All I did was set up a guard marker by the barrier, break it, then lure the
rock giant back a little so my greens could jump on it's back while I
helped with my Overlord.  Now that that's done, we can head into the mines.

Glittering Mine:

Break the barrier here and some elves will run by.  Break the barrels.  If
you head down the path, you'll see a scene with a giant mama slug eating a
huge trunk of gold!  Time to get it back!  Break the barrier.  If you go
right, there's a brown spawning pit and a dead end, so head left and go
kick some giant slug... errm, butt?  Once dead, the gold will be yours, and
some elves will tell you about more deeper in.  So bring it back and let's
dive in to find the other trunks!

From the slug room, head right down the path.  When the path breaks to the
right, take it for some more loot, then go back and continue along to a
room with some barriers.  Before breaking them, head straight around a
path that will lead to some dwarves and another trunk of gold.  Bring it back
then head to the barrier room.

Break the barriers and kill the dwarves.  At the back of the room is another
trunk of gold and a wheel.  Grab the gold first, as the wheel will open a
path leading further into the mine.  Once the gold is safely back in the
waypoint, come back and turn the wheel here.  Kill the dwarves behind it and
to the right is more barrels.  To the left is where we wanna head once you're
ready.  When you head down the path you'll find more dwarves to kill and a
red spawning pit.  Head past the pit, killing more dwarves along the way,
and break more barriers.  Keep heading around the path, up some stairs to a
wooden platform.

You'll see a scene with some elves that are trapped.  Since we're good, we
need to kill the slugs before we turn the wheel so we don't get corruption
points.  So go ahead and kill the slugs and push the cart over the slug hole.
Then turn the wheel that will let the elves out.  Grab the gold and break the
barriers so they can carry it farther on.  Have some minions turn the wheel
to open the gate, leading back to the first slug room.  Bring the gold
around to the waypoint at the entrance.  Now that we got all the gold, let's
get out of here.

Golden Hills:

Replenish your minions if needed.  Head up the path around the side of the
mines to the barriers that are in your way.  Break them down and continue
along and you'll see a flamethrower dwarf.  These things will kill you VERY
fast if you're not careful.  What I did was set up a guard marker out of the
way and sneak around it with my Overlord, hitting it from the back and
avoiding the spray of flames.  Once it's life is low, it'll start to sputter,
so you need to run away before he explodes.


[Another good strategy was emailed to me by DaCheat:
Instead of losing minions by setting up guard markers, all you need to do is
use your "slow" spell. Once you use it, you have plenty of time to run around
and hit the tank in the back. You can defeat these nasty things in a matter of
seconds!]

Continue up the path until you get to a solid-looking door.  To break it
down, we need to use the spikey mine there.  Hold your minions away from it
and send one minion over to grab a mine.  Run it to the door and it'll
explode, damaging it.  It will take two mines to successfully break the
door down.  Head through once it's opened.

You'll come to a fort that's protecting their brewery, which is where we're
headed.  If you head around the path to the left, you'll find another
waypoint gate.  Now we need to break down another solid-looking door here.
(Just so you know, there is a tower object up on the fort wall, but we can't
get to it just yet)

As you approach the door, the dwarves up top will throw mines at you.  Use
these mines to break the door down.  To do this, you need to have the dwarf
throw a mine at you, then quickly have a minion pick it up and run it over
to the door.  It takes four mines to blow up this door.

Once you blow it up, a big dwarf (oxymoron? :D) will come out so kill him.
Head in and kill the dwarves that greet you.  Break all of the barrels you
come across.  Head to the right and up the stairs, up to the wooden
platform and follow it around while killing the dwarves.  Keep heading around
the path and up the stairs.  Here is the tower object you might have seen
before, so take it back to the waypoint.  This time it's more health!

Go ahead and kill the rest of the dwarves in the area and loot the place
clean.  Once you're done, head to the big building in the area, which is
the Brewery, because that's the way to the Arcanium Mines!

Brewery:

We'll get a quest as we walk in the entrance to get the beer kettle while we
are in here.  So head on in.  Go down the stairs and kill the dwarves here,
break the barrels as well.  You can either head forward or left.  Head forward
to the door in front of you, killing more dwarves.  You can't head through it
yet because we need to find some red spokes for the broken wheel on the left.
To the right, behind some barrels, is a shield spell, so bring that back to
the waypoint.

Head back to the entrance and take the other path here.  Flip the lever next
to the door to stop the beer from flowing.  Some dwarves will come out of the
door now, unhappy that his beer supply has dwindled, so kill them.  Head into
the room, break the barrels and things in there, then grab the spoke and take
it back to the wheel.  That was easy!

From the room you found it in, head through the other door here and down some
stairs to fight more dwarves.  Head around to the left and break more stuff
here.  Send one minion over the pipe to push the lever so the door next to
you will open.  Kill the dwarves that come out and head in and lootage!

Now head back around and up the stairs, then up more stairs to your left.  For
this next part, set up a guard marker, then send it over to the door across
the pipe.  (though I suppose you could set up some reds and just shoot them
from a distance)  Recall one minion and have him flip the lever to make the
door open.  Kill the dwarves that come out and the door next to you will open
and some dwarves will pop out of this one as well.  So recall your minions
and fight these dwarves.

Head into the room and kill the dwarves there so they won't shoot you from up
high while you walk back and forth down the path below them.  Now head back
out of the room, down the stairs heading left.  Break the barrels, crates, and
barriers blocking your way.  Head up a little to be attacked by a big dwarf.

Go on up the stairs on your left.  You'll find brown and red spawning pits,
as well as a mana pit.  Kill the dwarves and up here and head through the
door near the mana pit.  Kill the dwarves and loot the room.  Back outside,
you'll notice a pipe in front of you.  Guard mark some minions to send over
and kill the dwarves.  (Reds and greens will be able to attack from farther
away, which means less dead minions.)  Have one minion flip the lever there
Some more dwarves will come out, so have your minions kill them.

Once they're dead, the door across the way will open up and yet more
dwarves will run out and right over to you.  So, recall your minions and take
em out.  Once these are dead, head down the stairs, up the other ones, and
go in the room.  Proceed through, slowly killing more dwarves and looting.
As you head down the hall, to your left is a giant beer barrel to push, so
go ahead and push it!  There's a lot of loot back here, so don't miss any!

Once you're done, head down the hall further for the other red spoke.  Turn
the wheel outside the door here and form a bridge that leads back to the red
wheel.  Turn it now to open the door that leads back to the outside and more
dwarves will come out.  Kill them, but before going through, go back to the
red wheel and next to it is the elevator to the second area of the brewery.

Brewery (2):

There's a blood pit and a brown spawning pit if you need.  You'll see a scene
when you take a step forward.  So let's get started.  Next to the brown
spawning pit is a pipe you minions can head down.  Be careful though because
the dwarves up top will shoot if they see a minion.  So send one down the
pipe and onto the ground on the other side, heading left to flip the lever.

Head down the path more and other left side before the door is another pipe to
head down, this time with dwarves on the ground as well as the top.  Guard
mark some reds and send them about halfway down the pipe to shoot the
dwarves from afar.  Then bring them back and sweep one over to flip the lever.
(It seems if your minions walk hugging the wall, the dwarves up top can't hit
them.)

Once that lever is flipped, some really angry dwarves will come running out,
so dispose of them.  Once the fight is over, head in the door to grab the
beer kettle.  When you go to take it back to the waypoint, some dwarves will
be there and attack you, so kill them and continue to take the kettle to your
waypoint.  Yay!  Now let's head back up to the top of the brewery and out the
door we opened with the wheel!

Golden Hills:

The door here will automatically open as you approach it.  Go right for
another waypoint gate.  We want to head to the path that leads around the side
of the brewery, toward a blood pit and some sheep.  (It's the path left of
where we first came out)  A little up the path is a mana pit as well.  Kill
the sheep.  If you head straight on the path, you'll find a wheel to turn.
Turn it and a bridge will form over the chasm.

Head across and you'll be back at the other side of the brewery.  Turn right
and follow the path up the hill toward a structure with a large bell.  Kill
the dwarves up here and grab the domination spell up here.  Carry it back to
your waypoint.

Now you need to head back toward where we killed the sheep (where the mana
pit is) and head up around the hill.  Head down the path and to the right is
some looties.  So grab it and head back around the other side.  And elf will
run out of the mine and yell about the mine being overrun.  Before heading
in, pillage the outside area and break all of the fire barriers.

Arcanium Mine:

Once inside you'll see the smelter right in front of you.  But it's not that
easy... Even though you could run over and grab it right now, your minions
won't be able to carry it back over the same way.  We need to clear the path
for it first.  Let's head right first to kill the dwarves and break some
stuffies.  We're not going to head down the path over here with the slugs yet
however.  (Of course you could head down that way if you wanted to plug up
the slug holes early on.  Just head through the room to the other side to
get the scene to kill the mama slug, but I'm going the other way around for
now, we'll get here eventually...)

[An alternate strategy for this place was emailed to me by Jan:
I went the wrong way and missed the smelter completely, but it ended up
working out pretty well because after I cleared all the slugs (basically
everything but the flamethrowers), I just used a massive army of red minions
to walk to the smelter back and they happily ignored the flamethrower dwarves,
since they were immune to the fire attack.]

Instead, let's take the path to the left of the entrance that leads to the
smelter.  (There's a brown spawning pit next to the entrance, as well as a
red and green one by the place we just looted.)  When you go to head down the
path, you'll come across more flamethrower dwarves.  Carefully take them out.
Remember, they explode!  Head up the ramp to the right and in the back is a
blue spawning pit.  Next to it is stairs leading down to a lever to flip.
Flipping it will stop the flames coming up from the furnace.  Some slugs will
come up the ramp there.  They'll just keep coming out of their holes for now.
We'll plug them up later.

[This alternate beginning route was emailed to me by Wadka:
Sweep your browns down the ramp and keep them VERY far left.  This will keep
the flamethrower dwarves from noticing them.  Guide them up the ramp and kill
the miners.  Now, wait until the throwers move toward the right, and you
should be able to bring your Overlord and all the other minions down the ramp,
and hug the wall.  Now bring them up the newly cleared ramp, and you should
be safe for the moment.  Follow the platform to the switch, and use it to
deactivate the flame pit so the slugs can kill the 2 flamethrowers.]

Just run past the holes, ignoring the smelter for the time being.  Head up
the ramp, then straight down the other side.  Head to the left and you'll
see a red spawning pit and a bunch of fire beetles.  Head around the path,
killing the beetles, until you reach another fire spell!  If you have your
minions carry it now, they'll want to take it up the path with the flames, so
either leave it for now or have them carry it at least a little up the path
and then recall them.

Head back up the ramp to the path overlooking the furnace flames.  If you
want, you can either send your minions down the small path to kill the
dwarves, or just turn the levers, allowing the dwarves to see the slugs.
When they go across the furnace, just quickly flip the lever again to toast
em!  BBQ dwarf anyone? O.o

Once you're done, continue on, down some stairs and down the ramp along the
path.  There's a green spawning pit here and a barrier.  Break the barrier,
then get ready for a fight with mama slug.  When you try to head down the
path, the mama slug will come out of the cave.  We gotta kill her to stop
the baby slugs from spawning from their holes.  Carefully kill her, (greens
and fire works nicely), then once she's dead, the holes are plugged, so the
baby slugs can't come out anymore.  There's still a few around the area,
though, so go ahead and kill them before moving on.

Head back to the smelter.  Have some minions pick it up and they'll carry it
to the furnaces (they'll stop before they get to the fire)  Have a few more
guys grab the fire spell from before as well.  Go up to the levers above the
furnaces.  In the middle of the platform is a minion path down.  There's a
hidden sack o' cash in between all the way in the back if you break the signs.
Sweep 7 minions back there and they will grab it.  This took me a few tries
to get them to grab it, but it's there, so just keep sweeping your minions
around until they finally grab it.

Now flip the levers as needed to get your minions through the fiery furnace.
Bring the smelter, the spell, and the gold back to the waypoint.  Not a bad
haul, eh?  Now go and forge yourself some sweet new stuffies! :D  Afterwards,
head back to the Golden Hills.

[If you didn't want to flip levers and all that, Nate gave me another way:
In the Arcanium mines, when you have to turn the fire pits on and off to carry
stuff out, if you use all Red minions as carriers, they'll be able to walk
through the fire and you don't have to worry about switching anything.  At
this point in the game you should have a good 30 minions under your control,
so it's very possible.  Since Reds aren't the best for dealing with Dwarves or
slugs, though, it's best to wait until you've got all those taken care of.]

Golden Hills:

Now it's time to head to the Temple Construction Site.  Head back to the
fortress that was around the brewery entrance.  From the brewery entrance,
head over to the top right exit to this area.  An elf will run out and he'll
die, and then Gnarl will mention something about a crazy scheme.  So head on
in.

Temple Construction Site:

We'll need to fight that huge lava golem down there later, so be prepared ><
Head left, breaking the barrels.  There's a rolling monster in these areas,
so be careful.  To fight these, let them see you and start rolling at you,
then quickly run out of the way so they crash into the wall.  Then lay the
smack down.

Now then, head down the path, carefully killing the rolling monster.  Break
the barrels and you'll find a brown spawning pit.  Down the way you can see
another rolling monster, so kill it and then break down the barrier.  There
is another narrow hall with another rolling monster, so take it out.  Break
more barrels and head down the path to more barrels.

Continue for another narrow hall with... another rolling monster.  Then...
guess what?!  Yup, another one after that!  After that one is... another one!
This time there are some barrels to break before he really sees you.  So
break them, then break him!  After this one... is... stairs! :D  Break the
barrels up here.

As you go to head down the stairs to go further on, you'll see some dwarves
trying to battle a rolling monster, but they're on opposite sides of a small
chasm.  You can either sweep your minions down to where the block it and push
it over so the rolling monster can kill the dwarves, then killing it... or
you can kill the dwarves and leave the monster where it is!

Either way, once you're done, turn the wheel here to open the gate.  Head
through to find a waypoint and some red and brown spawning pits.  Head around
the path and you'll hear some whining trapped elves and you'll see another
two rolling monsters.  Take them out.  If you want, have some reds and greens
up top where the monsters can't see them to support you while you take them
out.  Once they're dead, turn the wheel to let the elves out.  There's a blue
spawning pit over in a corner behind some big stone pillars.

Push the giant stone on the opposite side of the room from the elves into
place to form a walkway toward the back of the area.  Head up the stairs and
around to turn the wheel.  So now we need to have a minion carry mines over
to the solid-looking door near the stairs we just came up.  It will take 4
mines to blow it up.

Once the door is open, head on through.  There will be another narrow hall
with a rolling monster so kill it.  Have your minions push the block at the
end to open the path that leads on.  Kill the rolling monster behind it and
grab the loot in the chests there.  Head to the path next to the stairs,
killing the dwarves.  There's a green spawning pit and a blood pit here.
Move the blocks one by one for a little alcove of treasure.

Head back to the stairs and up them.  Head down the path and you'll see that
lava golem from before... oh yeah... this guy.  Head up a few steps for a
scene.  Now we gotta go kill the golem.  Actually, he's really easy!  Just
run around and break the barriers that are holding back the rolling monsters
and let them do all the work for you!

[A more detailed approach was emailed to me by Wadka:
Honestly, this should be the easiest fight you've had so far.  Carefully study
the map from your platform, and you will see that the 2 western pens of the
"Rolly-polly" (my name) enemies can be reached if you go down the ramp.  My
experience is that 14 browns can destroy the barricade before the guardian can
react.  Free the "top right" first, and let him impact.  When the guardian has
recovered, sweep some browns to the "bottom right".  When they are almost
broken through, send your weaker minions down the path to the "top left" rolly
pen.  Once your browns are back, have them break the "bottom left", and the
guardian will be dropped without a single minion lost.]

Now, in an alcove, down near where the golem was, is the final minion tower
object!  Bring it back to the waypoint, killing the dwarves and bridging the
gap so they can get through.

Now head to the statue, so that Gnarl can execute this "cunning plan".  Sweep
four or five brown minions into the statue, then let's get out of here.
Head on out.

Golden Hills:

Head now to the Royal Halls, which is across the bridge from the back exit of
the brewery.  As you approach, you'll find out the elves are upset because the
last of the elf women are trapped in the stronghold.  Well, we need to head
in so we can fight Goldo anyway, so sweep some blues down and across the water
and up to turn the wheel.  Head across the bridge and kill the dwarves that
come out the door.

Once you head in, to your left up the platform is a sack o' cash, so make sure
to grab it!  Kill the other dwarves in the around here and loot.  Once you
head in a little ways, a flamethrower dwarf will appear back at the entrance
so kill him.  Head up the stairs to the right of the entrance.  You'll get
an update on the status of your other minions that hitched a ride in the
Mother Goddess Statue.

Head around the path until you get to some stairs that lead to the path that
leads to the door in.  Before heading down too far, there's a flamethrower
dwarf coming up, as well as a few other dwarves, so you might want to lure
the other ones away and kill them before taking on the flamethrower.  Once
he's dead, head on in.

Royal Halls:

I should warn you now, when you head forward, there are three flamethrower
dwarves here! O.O  Also, when you hit them enough and they do their blow-up
thing, debris will fall all around and can crush you, so keep very away!
Once they're dead, a few crossbow dwarves will appear, so take them out.

Before you head on to the next room, there's a room to the left, if you're
coming from the entrance, that contains loot and another large sack o' gold.
Bring it back now before heading on, or it'll be lost forever!  Now you can
head through the door that leads further on, across from the entrance.

In this room is a waypoint, a blood pit, a mana pit, and all four spawning
pits, so take advantage if you need!  Then head into the next room.  In here
you'll see Goldo, and he'll run into the door and close it behind him.  When
you go to pursue him, he'll come out... with Rollie!  ><

Goldo and Rollie really aren't that bad... What I did was leave my minions in
the corner behind the pillar so they don't get singed, then target Goldo and
strafe around to the back of him and give him a couple smacks until Rollie
turns a bit, then strafe around and smack him again.  Once he's at about half
his life, you'll see a small scene, then you'll be able to finish the fight.
Keep up this strategy, and he'll be dead in no time.  Once he's done, just
run up and hit him one last time, and he'll explode!

Head into the next room for a scene.  This place is going crash down around
us!  Do we save the gold or the elves?  We're good, so save the poor tree
huggers!  (There's a brown spawning pit here if you don't have any minions
left.)  Have them turn the wheel to complete the bridge so the elves can
escape with you, then get out of there!  As you are heading out of the
stronghold, Gnarl will tell you that he's got some info, so head to the tower.

Ruborian Desert:

Head through the new warp from your tower to the Ruborian Desert. (I hate this
place...)  If you head straight across the water, you'll find a treasure
chest.  If you try to go left from the waypoint gate, there will be some thick
bones blocking your path.  We'll need to blow them up later.  So for now,
head right, killing the raiders as you go.

[Before heading on, this tip was emailed to me by heavenzdarknezz, if you want
to do it a different way...
In the ruborian desert I killed the guy that runs across the sand and is eaten
by the worm by sending my minions after him as I stayed with the two that stay
and fight. As a result when I got to the sand I got no worm (Gnarl didn't even
mention them). As a result I was able to run across the sand worm free. No
rumbling or any sign of the worms. I was able to get the mana object and all
the treasure without even worrying about them. After the cut seen with Jewel,
the worms will be there as normal]

If you go up the little hill, there's some loot there.  Now head across the
bone bridge.  To your left, you'll see a raider heading across the sand and a
worm will come up and eat him.  There is a tower object across the sand, but
leave it there for now.

We need to head across the sand to get to the next area though.  I suggest
putting all of your minions away and then running across, or else a lot of
them will get eaten.  Once across the sand, you'll see a blaster bug.  If
you attack it, it'll explode and another will respawn.  To your right is an
alcove with a brown spawning pit, so grab one out.  Now when you go to head
down the path more, you'll see some eggs.  Have a minion grab an egg and lure
the blaster bug over to the sand you just crossed over.  Once the sand starts
rumbling, have your minion run back really quick and the worm will come up
to eat the bug.  It'll explode and damage the worm.  It takes two blaster
bugs to kill the worm, so go ahead and do it again.

Once the worm is dead, you'll be able to run across this patch of sand with no
worries!  So, now grab the tower object and return it to your waypoint for
the last mana object!  Return now to the blaster bugs and you'll see more of
those bone barriers around.  Use an egg to lure the bugs to the barriers, then
hit them a few times.  Once their health is down, run away and let them
explode to break the barriers.  After you blow them up, continue on and you'll
see a scene with Jewel.  Blow up the barrier here, kill the raiders, and
you'll be back at your waypoint gate!

Have another buggie blow up the remaining barrier here so we can go on.  Now
we need to cross more desert.  There is a worm in here, so let's lure two
blaster bugs over to be eaten, so your minions don't become worm food!  Once
that worm is dead, you can safely cross the sand.  When you get to the path,
take it to the right, up to where the raiders and the "new sheepies" are.
There is a tower object there (and some loot), so bring it back across the
sand and to your waypoint gate for more health!

From where you found the tower object, head down the path and you'll find a
brown spawning pit.  Keep heading down and you'll get to a chasm that Jewel
will leap across to the raider's town.  We need to get rid of some worms in
this area so that we can get to the final health tower object before we find
our way around.  To the right, you'll see a small alcove with a blaster bug
spawn and an egg nest.  So, send a minion over to grab an egg and explode the
3-4 worms to the right.  There's also 1 to the left side, so get rid of him
as well.  If you head to the right from the chasm, you'll find some stairs
to go up on your left.  Head up and you'll find that last health tower object.
Bring it back, then return to the chasm.

Head to the left and kill the raiders here.  Now you'll need to lure a blaster
bug over to these bone barriers over here.  It might take 2 eggs to get them
all the way over.  Just slowly lure it as far as you can, then quickly grab
another one and run it the rest of the way.  The barrier to the left leads
to some loot across sand with another worm in it.  The barrier to the right
leads to a path with bugs and fire raiders (it looks like the path splits, but
both sides lead around to the same point) and around to the wheel that will
bridge the gap so we can head into the raider town.

Go back and grab some minions before heading into the town.  Once inside, kill
the raiders that infest the area and grab all of the loot.  When you're ready
to go on, head to the right and up the middle and now we'll need to drive
Jewel up the middle to the Tower Gate across the way.  To do this, you'll need
to position some minions on all of the little breaks along the walls leading
up to the waypoint gate.  Once you've done that, run her to the middle and
up the path.  She'll be transported to your tower.

Before returning to interrogate Jewel, let's go to the right and grab an egg
to have the blaster bug blow up the barrier on the right.  Head down the
path to the Mother Goddess Statue and have your minions carry it around.  As
they get close to the gate, some elves will appear and ask for it back.  Since
we're good, just have your minions place it on the platform.  Now let's get
out of here.  I hate this place!  Go to your tower.

Free Spree:

Well, the interrogation doesn't really take that long, Jewel is an easy nut
to crack.  You'll find out Kahn will be angry that you have her, and he'll go
and attack Spree.  So now we need to save the town of Spree... again.

Head to Mellow Hills and as you follow the path around to Spree, some raiders
will attack you.  Go on to Spree and it'll be under attack by some beholders.
These can only be killed if you get some reds and greens and place them up on
the platforms to rain down their terror upon them.  (Though the blue ones can
be killed with your fire spell, and the red ones can't be damaged by the red
minions)  So go ahead to the 3 back exits of Spree, where each beholder will
be, and there will be conveniently placed near high platforms.  So, sweep your
minions up, guard mark them, then stay at the bottom to get rid of the raiders
as they come out of the beholders.

After the beholders are dead, the peasants will beg you to take them back,
just leave them alone and head back to your tower.  We need to get to Heaven's
Peak to save them.

Heaven's Peak:

Head on over to Heaven's Peak and you'll see 2 beholders ahead and there's
also one to the right around the corner.  Grab some minions quickly because
the raiders will all run up the path and attack you while you're summoning
them.  Kill these beholders the same way as in Spree, with greens and reds.
Guard mark them on the edge up high and let them kill.

Once they're all dead, head down the stairs and across the way through the
opening and you'll meet Kahn.  This guy is... big.  Guard mark your minions
there, then run down the stairs and around to meet him.  Strafe around him to
hit from behind or you'll be dealing with the business end of his flail!  After
a few hits, he'll run away.  Before chasing after him, kill the beholders.
There's a red spawning pit near the stairs and a green one up the stairs in
the back of the area.

Head down the stairs and up the path.  More raiders will attack you up here.
Keep heading around the path and you'll see a scene of more beholders spawning
more raiders.  Just keep going forward and around the path, and you'll see
Kahn again.  This part looks hard, but I found a decent way to do it.  Head
to the left and down the path that the raiders keep heading up. (If you can,
turning the wheel will stop the raiders from coming, but I just left it alone
until the fight was over)  Head across to the stairs and run up and guard
mark your minions by the corner.  Behind you is a green spawning pit if you
need more.  Just have your green shred him from up here.  (you can use your
fire spell on the raiders if you want, but it doesn't seem to do anything to
Kahn)

He'll run away again, so we gotta chase him... again.  Head around where Kahn
ran off to and kill the raiders here.  At the end of the path is a spawning
pit area where you can replenish your minions!  Head up the stairs toward the
Halfway to Heaven Inn for the final showdown!  Run your minions up to the
entrance to the Inn and station them there with a guard marker.  You can use
your fire spell (if you have any mana left) to kill the beholders.  Just have
your greens and reds totally whip his butt!  Then go in for the final blow.

Back to the Tower:

All hail the return of the Overlord! ... but that's not you.  The real deal is
back and guess what... now we're spell-less, minion-less, and it sucks.  At
least your mistress is still on your side! :D  Ok now we need to get our
spells and, MORE importantly, your minions back.

Head down the stairs to the Tower Heart.  You'll see your mistress damage it
a bit, then you'll need to fight a bunch of evil minions.  After they're dead,
you'll get your spells back!  Head over toward the brown spawning pit and one
of them will pop out!  The browns are back on our side!  Yay!  Grab 10 more
and head through the hole in the wall that the wizard made.

Head along the path under the archway, kill the evil minions, then head up the
path to the right, killing the reds that pop out.  Turn the wheel here and
grab the red minion hive, bringing it back to the spawning pit room.  The
minions that pop out of the ground will just keep respawning, so just remember
to kill them whenever your minions are carrying these hives back, so they don't
die.

Grab 10 reds, then go back into the hole.  Head under the archway again and
send the reds into the lava to retrieve the blue hive.  Take it back and then
grab 10 blues.  Head back through the hole to the path under the archway and
head up to the wheel there in the lava.  Have some reds turn it and walk
across the bridge that forms and down the path.  Head to the right and bring
only blues into the water with you.  When you go to grab the green hive,
some minions will pop up and you'll need to kill them.  Bring the hive back
to the spawning room and take a full set of minions with you.

Head back towards where you got the green hive, but turn left when the path
splits, and have some greens dissipate the poison there.  Kill the things
around.  If you head to the path on the left, it'll lead to a few wheels,
and turning them brings you back to the spawning pit room.  From the green
poison room, head to the poison barrier that's blocking the door and get rid
of it.  Inside is the final boss fight, so get ready!  Have 5 minions open
the door.

Kill the Wizard:

This guy is not bad, as long as you know how to defeat him.  When he puts up
a barrier, use the minion of that same color to attack him and his barrier
will break, causing him to fall onto the floor.  Run in and smack him with
your weapon until he pushes you away.  Dodge his sweeping attacks and his
whirlwind.  He'll send waves of evil minions at you as well, so kill them
too.  Just keep up this strategy until he falls, it won't take long.  Enjoy
your ending!

[Another method emailed to me by M B P 2005:
An easy way I found out to defeat the wizard is just to have your minions set
on guard as soon as the door opens!(Its like a little U shaped place as soon
as the door opens) That way when he does his tornado thing your minions wont
die! Instead they will be ready to attack the wizard when ever he changes
colors. I do advise that when you send your specific minions to attack, as
soon as he gets up, send them back to the front of the door, because thats
when he does his tornado thing!(Tornado kills all of your minions) Do this
about 2-3 times and that should be it for the evil wizard!!!]

